tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_sr_Latn.dic
.u2s3t2r1n
.u2s3t2r1p
.u2s3t2r1ć
.u2s3t2r1č
.u2s3tum
.2u1st2u1
.u2s3tur
.u2s3tuć
.u2š3ć
.u2š3č
.a2b3alij
.2a1b2a1
.abal2i1
.a2b3anac
.aban2a1
.a2b3evak
.ab2e1
.abev2a1
.a2b3erac
.aber2a1
.a2b3erir
.aber2i1
.a2b3irit
.ab2i1
.abir2i1
.a2b3j2u1
.ab2j
.2a2b3l2a1
.ab2l
.a2b3leg
.abl2e1
.a2b3lep
.a2b3lok
.abl2o1
.a2b3l2u1
.a2b3orig
.ab2o1
.abor2i1
.a2b3reak
.ab2r
.abr2e1
.2a1bre3a1
.a2b3rog
.abr2o1
.a2b3uzus
.ab2u1
.abuz2u1
.a2d3erac
.ad2e1
.ader2a1
.a2d3ve2r1b
.ad2v
.adv2e1
.a2d3j
.a2d3lat
.ad2l
.adl2a1
.a2d3ren
.ad2r
.adr2e1
.a2d3rog
.adr2o1
.a3g2nos
.a2g1n
.agn2o1
.a3g2noz
.a2nabap
.2a1n2a1
.2a1n2a1b2a1
.a2nabaz
.a2nabat
.a2nabi3o1
.anab2i1
.a2nabol
.anab2o1
.a2nagen
.anag2e1
.a2nagn2o1
.ana2g1n
.a2n3ag2o1
.2a2n2a1gr2a1
.anag2r
.a2nadem
.anad2e1
.a2nadip2l
.anad2i1
.a2nadoz
.anad2o1
.a2n3a4e2r2o1
.ana3e1
.a2nakal
.2a1n2a1k2a1
.a2nakam
.a2nakat
.a2nakef
.anak2e1
.2a2n2a1kl2a1
.anak2l
.a2nakl2i1
.a2nakoj
.anak2o1
.a2n3akuz
.anak2u1
.a2n3a2l1g
.a2n3a2l1d
.a2nalep
.anal2e1
.a2naliz
.anal2i1
.a2nalis
.a2nalit
.a2n3ame2r1t
.anam2e1
.a2namn2e1
.ana2m1n
.a2n3and2r
.ana2n1d
.a2nane3o1
.anan2e1
.a2n3a2n1t
.2a2n2a1pl2a1
.anap2l
.a2napl2e1
.a2napn2e1
.ana2p1n
.a2napn2o1
.a2napr2o1
.anap2r
.a2napt2i1
.ana2p1t
.a2n3apt2o1
.a2na2r1t
.a2n3a2r1h
.a2nasar
.anas2a1
.a2nase3i1
.anas2e1
.a2naspaz
.anas2p
.anasp2a1
.2a2n2a1st2a1
.anas2t
.a2nastig
.anast2i1
.a2nastom
.anast2o1
.a2natim
.anat2i1
.a2natom
.anat2o1
.a2natoc
.a2natr2e1
.anat2r
.a2natr2i1
.a2natr2o1
.a2nafaz
.anaf2a1
.a2n3afij
.anaf2i1
.2a2n2a1fil2a1
.a2nafon
.anaf2o1
.a2n3afrod
.anaf2r
.anafr2o1
.a2nakol
.a2nakron
.anak2r
.anakr2o1
.a2nakr2u1
.2a2n3a1lf2a1
.ana2l1f
.a2nafor
.a2nahor
.anah2o1
.a2nahr2o1
.anah2r
.a2n3eger
.an2e1
.aneg2e1
.a2n3ek2l
.a2n3ekum
.anek2u1
.a2n3elek
.anel2e1
.a2n3ener
.anen2e1
.a2n3ep2i1
.a2neor
.ane3o1
.a2n3e2r1g
.a2n3erit
.aner2i1
.a2n3e1st2e1
.anes2t
.a2n3id2r
.an2i1
.a2n3izog
.aniz2o1
.a2n3izom
.a2n3izur
.aniz2u1
.a2n3irid
.anir2i1
.a2n3ovar
.an2o1
.anov2a1
.a2n3o2k1s
.a2n3opis
.anop2i1
.a2n3o2r1h
.a2n3o2f1t
.a2n3o2r1g
.di2s3akor
.d2i1
.dis2a1
.disak2o1
.di2s3ju2n1k
.dis2j
.disj2u1
.di2s3kval
.dis2k
.disk2v
.diskv2a1
.di2s3ko2n1t
.disk2o1
.di2s3ko2r1d
.di2s3kr2e1
.disk2r
.d2i2s3kr2i1
.di2s3kur
.disk2u1
.di2s3l2o1
.dis2l
.di2s3orij
.dis2o1
.disor2i1
.di2s3parit
.dis2p
.disp2a1
.dispar2i1
.di2s3poz
.disp2o1
.di2s3pon
.di2s3prop
.disp2r
.dispr2o1
.di2s3ton
.dis2t
.dist2o1
.di2s3trak
.dist2r
.distr2a1
.i2n3abrup
.in2a1
.inab2r
.inabr2u1
.i2n3adek
.inad2e1
.i2n3akur
.inak2u1
.i2n3akc2e1
.ina2k1c
.i2n3amor
.inam2o1
.i2n3anic
.inan2i1
.i2n3aplik
.inap2l
.inapl2i1
.i2n3aps2t
.ina2p1s
.i2n3a2r1t
.i2n3augur
.ina3u1
.inaug2u1
.i2n3a1ur2a1
.i2n3afek
.inaf2e1
.i2n3evid
.in2e1
.inev2i1
.i2n3eg
.i2n3ed
.i2n3ek2v
.i2n3e2k1s
.i2n3elig
.inel2i1
.i2n3e2p1c
.i2n3efek
.inef2e1
.i2n3ob2l
.in2o1
.i2nogen
.inog2e1
.i2nokor
.inok2o1
.i2n3okup
.inok2u1
.i2n3oper
.inop2e1
.i2n3opor
.inop2o1
.i2n3ops2e1
.ino2p1s
.i2n3ofic
.inof2i1
.i2n3umb2r
.in2u1
.inu2m1b
.i2n3und2a1
.inu2n1d
.i2n3u2n1k
.i2n3util
.inut2i1
.2i1nte2r3i1
.i2n1t
.int2e1
.inte2r3o1
.inte2r3u1
.inte2r3a1
.int2e2r3e1
.inte3r4e2g1n
.2i1nte3r4es2i1
.inte3r4es2n
.inte3r4es2o1
.inte3r4es2u1
.inte3r4es2a1
.int2e3r4e1s2e1
.inte3r4e2ž1d2ž
.interež2d
.int2e3r4ij2e1
.int2e3r3j2e1
.inte2r1j
.inte3r4ogat
.interog2a1
.juri2s3k
.j2u1
.jur2i1
.juri2s3p
.nu2z3bel
.n2u1
.nuz2b
.nuzb2e1
.nu2z3bil2j
.nuzb2i1
.nu2z3ljub
.nuz2l
.nuz2l2j
.nuzlj2u1
.nu2z3r2e1
.nuz2r
.nu2z3r2j2e1
.nuz2r1j
.nu2z3už
.nuz2u1
.nu2s3pos
.nus2p
.nusp2o1
.nu2s3pr2o1
.nusp2r
.po2st3e2g1z
.pos2t
.post2e1
.po2st3ind2u1
.post2i1
.posti2n1d
.po2st3lim
.po2s3t2l
.postl2i1
.po2st3o2n1k
.p2o1st2o1
.po2st3oper
.postop2e1
.su2b3a1
.s2u1
.su2b3l
.su3b4aš
.su2b3i2n1v
.sub2i1
.su2b3ju2n1k
.sub2j
.subj2u1
.su2b3o2k1s
.sub2o1
.su2b3rep
.sub2r
.subr2e1
.su2b3rog
.subr2o1
.su2b3o2r1d
.supe2r3i1
.sup2e1
.supe2r3o1
.s2u1pe2r3u1
.supe2r3a1
.sup2e2r3e1
.supe3r4ior
.superi3o1
.tr2a1n2s3a1
.t2r
.tr2a1
.tra2n1s
.tran2s3c
.tran2s3e1
.tran2s3k
.tran2s3l
.tran2s3m
.tran2s3n
.tran2s3o1
.tran2s3p
.tran2s3t
.tran2s3u1
.tran2s3v
.tran2s3n2j
.tran3s4ep
.tran3s4kr2i1
.transk2r
.tran3s4um
.tran3s4ud
.a2n3jon
.an2j
.anj2o1
.i2n3jek
.in2j
.inj2e1
.i2n3jur
.inj2u1
.i2n3jus2t
.o2d3žal
.od2ž
.odž2a1
.o2d3žal2j
.o2d3ž2i1
.o2d3ž2v
.o2d3ž2e1
.pre2d3ž2i1
.pred2ž
.pr2e2d3ž2e1
.na2d3žd2r
.nad2ž
.na2dž2d
.na2d3ž2n2j
.na2dž2n
.na2d3ž2e1
.na2d3žan2j
.nadž2a1
.na2d3žir
.nadž2i1
.na2d3živ
.na2d3žup
.nadž2u1
2dž.
